Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Article 1. General Provisions and Definitions.

§ 91-8-101.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Mississippi Uniform Trust Code.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-102.
Scope.

This chapter applies to express trusts, charitable or noncharitable, and trusts created pursuant to a statute, judgment, or decree that requires the trust to be administered in the manner of an express trust.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-103.
Definitions.

[Effective from and after January 1, 2020, this section will read as follows:]

In this chapter:

“Action,” with respect to an act of a trustee, includes a failure to act.

“Ascertainable standard” means a standard relating to an individual’s health, education, support, or maintenance within the meaning of Section 2041(b)(1)(A) or 2514(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as in effect on July 1, 2014, or as later amended.

“Beneficial interest” means a distribution interest or a remainder interest; provided, however, a beneficial interest specifically excludes a power of appointment or a power reserved by a settlor.

“Beneficiary” means a person that:

Has a present or future beneficial interest in a trust, vested or contingent; or

In a capacity other than that of trustee, holds a power of appointment over trust property.

“Beneficiary surrogate” means a person, including a trust protector or trust advisor, other than a trustee, designated by the settlor in the trust instrument or in a writing delivered to the trustee, or designated in a writing delivered to the trustee by a trust protector or trust advisor with power under the terms of the trust instrument to receive notices, information, and reports otherwise required to be provided to a beneficiary under Section 91-8-813(a) and (b), or to represent a beneficiary under Section 91-8-303(8).

“Charitable trust” means a trust, or portion of a trust, created for a charitable purpose described in Section 91-8-405(a).

“Conservator” means a person appointed by the court to administer the estate of a minor or adult individual as defined in Section 93-20-102.

“Directed trust” means a trust where through the terms of the trust, one or more persons are given the authority to direct or consent to a fiduciary’s actual or proposed investment decision, distribution decision, or any other decision of the fiduciary.

“Distribution interest” means:

An interest, other than a remainder interest, held by an eligible distributee or permissible distributee under a trust and may be a current distribution interest or a future distribution interest;

A distribution interest is classified as either a mandatory interest, a support interest or a discretionary interest; and although not the exclusive means to create each such respective distribution interest, absent clear and convincing evidence to the contrary, use of the example language accompanying the following definitions of each such respective distribution interest results in the indicated classification of distribution interest:

a. All income shall be distributed to a named beneficiary; or

b. One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) a year shall be distributed to a named beneficiary;

a. The trustee shall make distributions for health, education, maintenance, and support;

b. Notwithstanding the distribution language used, if a trust instrument containing such distribution language specifically provides that the trustee exercise discretion in a reasonable manner with regard to a discretionary interest, then notwithstanding any other provision of this subparagraph defining distribution interests, the distribution interest shall be classified as a support interest;

A mandatory interest means a distribution interest in which the timing of any distribution must occur within one (1) year from the date the right to the distribution arises and the trustee has no discretion in determining whether a distribution shall be made or the amount of such distribution; example distribution language indicating a mandatory interest includes, but is not limited to:

A support interest means a distribution interest that is not a mandatory interest but still contains mandatory language such as “shall make distributions” and is coupled with a standard capable of judicial interpretation; example distribution language indicating a support interest includes, but is not limited to:

A discretionary interest means any interest that is not a mandatory or a support interest and is any distribution interest where a trustee has any discretion to make or withhold a distribution; example distribution language indicating a discretionary interest includes, but is not limited to:

a. The trustee may, in the trustee’s sole and absolute discretion, make distributions for health, education, maintenance, and support;

b. The trustee, in the trustee’s sole and absolute discretion, shall make distributions for health, education, maintenance, and support;

c. The trustee may make distributions for health, education, maintenance, and support;

d. The trustee shall make distributions for health, education, maintenance, and support; however, the trustee may exclude any of the beneficiaries or may make unequal distributions among them; or

e. The trustee may make distributions for health, education, maintenance, support, comfort, and general welfare;

f. A discretionary interest may also be evidenced by:

1. Permissive distribution language such as “may make distributions”;

2. Mandatory distribution language that is negated by the discretionary distribution language contained in the trust such as “the trustee shall make distributions in the trustee’s sole and absolute discretion”;

g. An interest that includes mandatory distribution language such as “shall” but is subsequently qualified by discretionary distribution language shall be classified as a discretionary interest and not as a support or a mandatory interest;

a. The trust shall be a mandatory interest only to the extent of the mandatory distribution language;

b. The trust shall be a support interest only to the extent of such support distribution language; and

c. The remaining trust property shall be held as a discretionary interest;

To the extent a trust contains distribution language indicating the existence of any combination of a mandatory, support and discretionary interest, that combined interest of the trust shall be divided and treated separately as follows:

For purposes of this subparagraph (C), a support interest that includes mandatory distribution language such as “shall” but is subsequently qualified by discretionary distribution language, shall be classified as a discretionary interest and not as a support interest.

“Environmental law” means a federal, state, or local law, rule, regulation, or ordinance relating to protection of the environment.

“Excluded fiduciary” means any trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector to the extent that, under the terms of a trust:

The trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector is excluded from exercising a power, or is relieved of a duty; and

The power or duty is granted or reserved to another person.

“Fiduciary” means:

A trustee, conservator, guardian, agent under any agency agreement or other instrument, an executor, personal representative or administrator of a decedent’s estate, or any other party, including a trust advisor or a trust protector, who is acting in a fiduciary capacity for any person, trust, or estate;

For purposes of subparagraph (A), an agency agreement includes, but is not limited to, any agreement under which any delegation is made, either pursuant to Section 91-8-807 or by anyone holding a power or duty pursuant to Article 12;

For purposes of the definition of fiduciary in Section 91-8-103, fiduciary does not mean any person who is an excluded fiduciary as such is defined in Section 91-8-103.

“Guardian” means a person appointed by the court to make decisions regarding the support, care, education, health, and welfare of a minor or adult individual as defined in Section 93-20-102. The term does not include a guardian ad litem.

“Interests of the beneficiaries” means the beneficial interests provided in the terms of the trust.

“Internal Revenue Code” means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as in effect on July 1, 2014, or as later amended.

“Jurisdiction,” with respect to a geographic area, includes a state or country.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government; governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; public corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Power of appointment” means:

An inter vivos or testamentary power to direct the disposition of trust property, other than a distribution decision made by a trustee or other fiduciary to a beneficiary;

Powers of appointment are held by the person to whom such power has been given, and not by a settlor in that person’s capacity as settlor.

“Power of withdrawal” means a presently exercisable general power of appointment other than a power: (A) exercisable by a trustee and limited by an ascertainable standard; or (B) exercisable by another person only upon consent of the trustee or a person holding an adverse interest.

“Property” means anything that may be the subject of ownership, whether real or personal, legal or equitable, or any interest therein.

“Qualified beneficiary” means a beneficiary who, on the date the beneficiary’s qualification is determined:

Is a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal;

Would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal if the interests of the distributees described in subparagraph (A) terminated on that date without causing the trust to terminate; or

Would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal if the trust terminated on that date.

“Remainder interest” means an interest under which a trust beneficiary will receive property held by a trust outright at some time during the future.

“Reserved power” means a power held by a settlor.

“Revocable,” as applied to a trust, means revocable by the settlor without the consent of the trustee or a person holding an adverse interest.

“Settlor” means a person, including a testator, who creates, or contributes property to, a trust. If more than one (1) person creates or contributes property to a trust, each person is a settlor of the portion of the trust property attributable to that person’s contribution except to the extent another person has the power to revoke or withdraw that portion.

“Spendthrift provision” means a term of a trust which restrains both voluntary and involuntary transfer of a beneficiary’s interest.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes an Indian tribe or band recognized by federal law or formally acknowledged by a state.

“Successors in interest” means the beneficiaries under the settlor’s will, if the settlor has a will, or in the absence of an effective will provision, the settlor’s heirs at law.

“Terms of a trust” means the manifestation of the settlor’s intent regarding a trust’s provisions as expressed in the trust instrument or as may be established by other evidence that would be admissible in a judicial proceeding.

“Trust advisor” means any person described in Section 91-8-1201(a).

“Trust instrument” means an instrument executed by the settlor that contains terms of the trust, including any amendments thereto.

“Trustee” includes an original, additional, and successor trustee, and a cotrustee.

“Trust protector” means any person described in Section 91-8-1201(a).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 3, Laws, 2016, ch. 396, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014; Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 8, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 91-8-104.
Knowledge.

Subject to subsection (b), a person has knowledge of a fact if the person:

Has actual knowledge of it;

Has received a notice or notification of it; or

From all the facts and circumstances known to the person at the time in question, has reason to know it.

An organization that conducts activities through employees has notice or knowledge of a fact involving a trust only from the time the information was received by an employee having responsibility to act for the trust, or would have been brought to the employee’s attention if the organization had exercised reasonable diligence. An organization exercises reasonable diligence if it maintains reasonable routines for communicating significant information to the employee having responsibility to act for the trust and there is reasonable compliance with the routines. Reasonable diligence does not require an employee of the organization to communicate information unless the communication is part of the individual’s regular duties or the individual knows a matter involving the trust would be materially affected by the information.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-105.
Default and mandatory rules.

Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, this chapter governs the duties and powers of a trustee or any other fiduciary under this chapter, relations among trustees and such other fiduciaries, and the rights and interests of a beneficiary. The terms of a trust may expand, restrict, eliminate, or otherwise vary the duties and powers of a trustee, any such other fiduciary, relations among any of them, and the rights and interests of a beneficiary; however, nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to override or nullify the provisions of subsection (b). The rule of statutory construction that statutes in derogation of the common law are to be strictly construed shall have no application to this section. Except as restricted by subsection (b), pursuant to this section, courts shall give maximum effect to the principal of freedom of disposition and to the enforceability of trust instruments.

The terms of a trust prevail over any provision of this chapter except:

The requirements for creating a trust;

The duty of a trustee to act in good faith in accordance with the terms and purposes of the trust and the interests of the beneficiaries;

The requirement that a trust and its terms be for the benefit of its beneficiaries as the interests of such beneficiaries are defined under the terms of the trust, and that the trust have a purpose that is lawful and possible to achieve;

The power of the court to modify or terminate a trust under Sections 91-8-410 through 91-8-416;

The effect of a spendthrift provision and the rights of certain creditors and assignees to reach a trust as provided in the Family Trust Preservation Act, Section 91-9-501 et seq.;

The power of the court under Section 91-8-702 to require, dispense with, or modify or terminate a bond;

The power of the court under Section 91-8-708(b) to adjust a trustee’s compensation specified in the terms of the trust which is unreasonably low or high;

Subject to subsection (d), the duty under Section 91-8-813(b) to notify beneficiaries of an irrevocable trust (including anyone who holds a power of appointment) who have attained twenty-five (25) years of age that the trust has been established as set forth in that Section 91-8-813(b);

Subject to subsection (d), the duty under Section 91-8-813(a)(1) and (2) to keep the beneficiaries (including anyone who holds a power of appointment) informed and to respond to the request of a beneficiary of an irrevocable trust for trustee’s reports and other information reasonably related to the administration of the trust;

The effect of an exculpatory term under Section 91-8-1008;

The rights under Sections 91-8-1010 through 91-8-1013 of a person other than a trustee or beneficiary;

Periods of limitation for commencing a judicial proceeding;

The power of the court to take such action and exercise such jurisdiction as may be necessary in the interests of justice; and

The subject-matter jurisdiction of the court and venue for commencing a proceeding as provided in Sections 91-8-203 and 91-8-204.

Any purpose enunciated as a material purpose of a trust in that trust’s trust instrument shall be treated as a material purpose of that trust for all purposes of this chapter.

Notwithstanding subsection (b)(8) and (9) of this section, the duties of a trustee to give notice, information and reports under Section 91-8-813(a) and (b) may be waived or modified in the trust instrument or by the settlor of the trust, or a trust protector or trust advisor that holds the power to so direct, directs otherwise in a writing delivered to the trustee in any of the following ways:

By waiving or modifying such duties as to all qualified beneficiaries during the lifetime of the settlor or the settlor’s spouse;

By specifying a different age at which a beneficiary or class of beneficiaries must be notified under Section 91-8-813(b); or

With respect to one or more of the beneficiaries, by designating a beneficiary surrogate to receive such notice, information and reports who will act in good faith to protect the interests of the beneficiary or beneficiaries.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 5, Laws, 2016, ch. 396, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-106.
Common law of trusts; principles of equity.

The common law of trusts and principles of equity supplement this chapter, except to the extent modified by this chapter or another statute of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-107.
Governing law.

The validity, construction and administration of a trust are determined by the law of the jurisdiction designated in the terms of the trust instrument.

In the absence of a controlling designation in the terms of the trust, the laws of the jurisdiction where the trust was executed determine the validity of the trust, construction of the trust instrument and the laws of descent, while the laws of the principal place of administration determine the administration of the trust.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-108.
Principal place of administration.

Without precluding other means for establishing a sufficient connection with the designated jurisdiction, the terms of a trust designating the principal place of administration are valid and controlling if:

A trustee’s principal place of business is located in or a trustee is a resident of the designated jurisdiction;

All or part of the administration occurs in the designated jurisdiction; administration includes, but is not limited to:

Maintenance of some trust records physically in the designated jurisdiction;

Wholly or partly preparing or arranging for the preparation, either on an exclusive or a nonexclusive basis, in the designated jurisdiction of an income tax return that must be filed for the trust; or

Some or all of the trust assets are deposited in the designated jurisdiction or physical evidence of the assets is held in the designated jurisdiction and the trust is being administered by a person defined in subsection (a)(1). For purposes of this subsection (a)(3), “deposited in the designated jurisdiction,” includes assets being held in any checking account, time deposit, certificate of deposit, brokerage account, trust company fiduciary account, or other similar account or deposit that is located in the designated jurisdiction.

The date on which the proposed transfer is anticipated to occur; and

The date, not less than sixty (60) days after the giving of the notice, by which the qualified beneficiary must notify the trustee of an objection to the proposed transfer.

Except as otherwise expressly provided by the terms of a governing instrument specifically addressing the governing law for trust administration or by court order, the laws of this state shall govern the administration of a trust while the trust is administered in this state. Without precluding other means for establishing that a trust is administered in this state, if any of the activities described in subsection (a) occur in this state, the trust is administered in this state.

A trustee shall administer the trust at a place appropriate to its purposes, its administration, and the interests of the beneficiaries; however, a trustee shall not be required, in the absence of a court order, to transfer the trust’s principal place of administration to another state or to a jurisdiction outside the United States even though such other state or jurisdiction outside the United States could also be appropriate to its purposes, its administration, and the interests of the beneficiaries.

Without precluding the right of the court to order, approve, or disapprove a transfer, the trustee may transfer the trust’s principal place of administration to another state or to a jurisdiction outside the United States, if the transfer is to a place appropriate to the trust’s purposes, its administration, and the interests of the beneficiaries.

The trustee shall notify the qualified beneficiaries of a proposed transfer of a trust’s principal place of administration to another state or to a jurisdiction outside the United States not less than sixty (60) days before initiating the transfer. The notice of proposed transfer must include:

The name of the jurisdiction to which the principal place of administration is to be transferred;

The address and telephone number at the new location at which the trustee can be contacted;

An explanation of the reasons for the proposed transfer;

The authority of a trustee under this section to transfer a trust’s principal place of administration terminates if a majority of the qualified beneficiaries described in Section 91-8-103 notify the trustee of an objection to the proposed transfer on or before the date specified in the notice.

In connection with a transfer of the trust’s principal place of administration, the trustee may transfer some or all of the trust property to a successor trustee designated in the terms of the trust or appointed pursuant to Section 91-8-704.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-109.
Methods and waiver of notice.

Notice to a person under this chapter or the sending of a document to a person under this chapter must be accomplished in a manner reasonably suitable under the circumstances and likely to result in receipt of the notice or document. Permissible methods of notice or for sending a document include first-class mail, personal delivery, delivery to the person’s last-known place of residence or place of business, or a properly directed electronic message.

Notice otherwise required under this chapter or a document otherwise required to be sent under this chapter need not be provided to a person whose identity or location is unknown to and not reasonably ascertainable by the trustee.

Notice under this chapter or the sending of a document under this chapter may be waived by the person to be notified or sent the document.

Notice of a judicial proceeding must be given as provided in the applicable rules of civil procedure.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-110.
Others treated as qualified beneficiaries.

A charitable organization expressly designated to receive distributions under the terms of a charitable trust has the rights of a qualified beneficiary under this chapter if the charitable organization, on the date the charitable organization’s qualification is being determined:

Is a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal;

Would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal if the interests of other distributees or permissible distributees then receiving or eligible to receive distributions terminated on that date without causing the trust to terminate; or

Would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal if the trust terminated on that date.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-111.
Nonjudicial settlement agreements.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), the trustee and qualified beneficiaries may enter into a binding nonjudicial settlement agreement with respect to any matter involving a trust.

A nonjudicial settlement agreement is valid only to the extent it does not violate a material purpose of the trust and includes terms and conditions that could be properly approved by the court under this chapter or other applicable law.

Matters that may be resolved by a nonjudicial settlement agreement include:

The interpretation or construction of the terms of the trust;

The approval of a trustee’s report or accounting;

Direction to a trustee to refrain from performing a particular act or the grant to a trustee of any necessary or desirable power;

The resignation or appointment of a trustee and the determination of a trustee’s compensation;

Transfer of a trust’s principal place of administration;

Liability of a trustee for an action relating to the trust;

The extent or waiver of bond of a trustee;

The governing law of the trust; and

The criteria for distribution to a beneficiary where the trustee is given discretion.

Any qualified beneficiary or trustee may request the court to approve a nonjudicial settlement agreement, to determine whether the representation as provided in Article 3 was adequate, and to determine whether the agreement contains terms and conditions the court could have properly approved.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-112.
Rules of construction.

The rules of construction that apply in this state to the interpretation of and disposition of property by will also apply as appropriate to the interpretation of the terms of a trust and the disposition of the trust property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2014.